West Virginia, session 2026, HB4588.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 31A. THE FEDERAL TAX CREDIT SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM. §18-31A-1. Participation in the federal tax credit scholarship program. (a) The State Treasurer shall:(1) Participate in the federal tax credit established under section 70411 of Pub. Law No. 119-21 for individuals who make qualified contributions to scholarship granting organizations; (2) Identify qualified scholarship granting organizations located in the state in accordance with the requirements of this article;(3) By the first day of January each year, submit to the Secretary of the Treasury of the United States and publish on its website a list of all qualified scholarship granting organizations that are located in the state; (4) Certify its own authority to provide such list upon submission;(5) Accept applications from scholarship granting organizations throughout the year for inclusion on the list submitted pursuant to subsection (a)(3) of this section; and (6) Establish policies solely for the purposes of administering the process and documentation necessary for an entity to be listed as a qualified scholarship granting organization.(b) This section shall take effect upon passage. Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home